District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2608.01

Health service corporations.

Repealed.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 52(r), 46 DCR 2118
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 5013(b)(3), 53 DCR 6899

History

1981 Ed., § 47-2608.1.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 5013(b)(3) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 5013(b)(3) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 5013(b)(3) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).

Emergency Legislation